Washington statutes.
RCW 46.04.295

Medium-speed electric vehicle.

"Medium-speed electric vehicle" means a self-propelled, electrically powered four-wheeled motor vehicle, equipped with a roll cage or crush-proof body design, whose speed attainable in one mile is more than twenty-five miles per hour but not more than thirty-five miles per hour and otherwise meets or exceeds the federal regulations set forth in 49 C.F.R. Sec. 571.500.

[ 2010 c 144 s 1; 2007 c 510 s 2.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2007 c 510: See note following RCW 46.04.320.